Washington statutes.
RCW 12.20.030

Judgment on merits.

Upon the verdict of a jury, the justice shall immediately render judgment thereon. When the trial is by the justice, judgment shall be entered within three days after the close of the trial.

[ 1957 c 89 s 13; Code 1881 s 1783; 1873 p 350 s 82; 1854 p 237 s 83; RRS s 1859.]